Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.005

"Mortgage" includes deed of trust and real estate contract.

The word "mortgage" as used in this title includes deed of trust and real estate contract.

[ 1982 c 3 s 44; 1973 c 130 s 28.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.